District of Columbia statutes.
7-1141.02

Establishment of the Department of Behavioral Health.

(a)

There is established as a separate, cabinet-level Department, subordinate to the Mayor, the Department of Behavioral Health.

(b)

The Department shall be the successor-in-interest to the Department of Mental Health, established by Chapter 11A of this title [§ 7-1131.01 et seq.], and the Department of Health Addiction Prevention and Recovery Administration, established in the Department of Health by the Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1996, effective July 17, 1996 (D.C. Official Code, Vol. 3) [Part A of subchapter XIV of Chapter 15 of Title 1].

History

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 5113, 60 DCR 12472

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5113 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5113 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 5111 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle J of Title V of the act may be cited as the “Department of Behavioral Health Establishment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.